src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_AAVA

[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:o   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;  ! -in/-oin superlatives should actually be divided into two classes
0      A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;  ! (-in mostly for words with "a" in 1. syllable)

LEXICON A_TARKKA

[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:ko A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
[CMP=POS]:ko   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0      A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_MATTA

[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a   A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:to A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HALPA




[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:va  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:po A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:vo   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ve    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:vo    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0:v    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_EHTA




[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:da  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:to A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:do   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:da    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:do    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RAMPA




[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ma  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:po A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:mo   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:po  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ma    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:mo    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VIHANTA




[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:na  A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:to A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:no   A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:to  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:na    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:ne    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:no    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
0:n    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AALTOILEVA


[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TYÖLLISTETTÄVÄ




[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:e  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RUMA




[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:a A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:a  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;   ! temporarily until A_AALTOILEVA words can be separated
0:e  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TYHMÄ




[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ä  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;   ! temporarily until A_TYÖLLISTETTÄVÄ words can be separated
0:e  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HOIKKA




[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:e A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_MYKKÄ




[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:e A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_POPPA




[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:a    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:e A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_HÖMPPÄ




[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:e A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VOIPA




[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:va    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:v    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pa A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ve A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:v    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KÄYPÄ




[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:vä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:v    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:pä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:p   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ve A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:v    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_MÄTÄ




[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:dä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:d    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:de A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:d    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_SANKA




[CMP=POS]:ka   A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka   A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ga    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:g    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ka   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ka   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ga A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:go   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VÄNKÄ




[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:gä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:g    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:kä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:k   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ge A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:g    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KULTA


[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:la    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:l    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:la A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:l    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÄNTÄ




[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:nä    A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:n    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:tä A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:nä A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:n    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_TURTA




[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ra    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
[CMP=POS]:r    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ta A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:t   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ra A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:r   A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;
